Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5279.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 132B of the General Laws, or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the town of Truro is hereby authorized to enact a bylaw regulating
the storage, use and application of pesticides within said town of Truro, to establish civil
penalties not to exceed $1,000 for each offense, and to otherwise enforce said bylaw through any
lawful means.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1